Wyoming, session 2025, HB0060.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-25-103 is created to read:

HB0060

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0382
21-25-103. Participation in female sports;
violations; remedies.

(a) Any student or a parent or guardian of a student
who is harmed by a violation of this chapter shall have a
private cause of action for injunctive relief, damages,
attorney fees and any other relief available under law
against the school, government entity, licensing or
accrediting organization, athletic association or athletic
organization violating this chapter.

(b) Any school that suffers any direct or indirect
harm as a result of a violation of this chapter shall have
a private cause of action for injunctive relief, damages,
attorney fees and any other relief available under law
against the government entity, licensing or accrediting
organization, athletic association or athletic organization
violating this chapter.

(c) A civil action commenced under this section shall
be brought not later than two (2) years after the violation
of this chapter occurred.

HB0060

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0382
Section 2. W.S. 21-25-101(a)(iii) and by creating new
paragraphs (v) through (viii) and 21-25-102(a)(intro), (b),
(c), (d)(i), (ii), (e) and by creating a new subsection (g)
are amended to read:

21-25-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this chapter:

(iii) "School" means a school consisting of
grades seven (7) kindergarten (K) through 12 (twelve), or
any combination of grades within this range, as determined
by the plan of organization by the school district board of
trustees or an institution of higher education;

(v) "Athletic activity" means an interscholastic
or intramural athletic team or sport that is sponsored by a
school or an organization of which the school is a member;

(vi) "Female" means a person who naturally has,
had, will have or would have, but for a congenital anomaly
or intentional or unintentional disruption, the
HB0060

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0382
reproductive system that, at some point, produces,
transports and utilizes eggs for fertilization;

(vii) "Institution of higher education" means
the University of Wyoming and Wyoming community colleges;

(viii) "Male" means a person who naturally has,
had, will have or would have, but for a congenital anomaly
or intentional or unintentional disruption, the
reproductive system that, at some point, produces,
transports and utilizes sperm for fertilization.

21-25-102. Participation in school athletic
activities.

(a) A public school or a private school that competes
against a public school shall expressly designate school
each athletic activities and teams activity as one (1) of
the following based on sex:

(b) A student of the male sex shall not compete, and
a public school shall not allow a student of the male sex
HB0060

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0382
to compete, in an athletic activity or team designated for
students of the female sex.

(c) A government entity or licensing or accrediting
organization shall not entertain a complaint, open an
investigation or take any other adverse action against a
school described in subsection (a) of this section for
maintaining separate school athletic activities and teams
for students of the female sex.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:

(i) Restrict the eligibility of any student to
participate in any interscholastic athletic activity
designated for students of the male sex or designated as
coed or mixed; or

(ii) Prohibit a school from permitting males to
train or practice with an interscholastic athletic activity
that is designated for females so long as no female is
deprived of a roster spot on a team or sport for an
athletic activity, opportunity to participate in a practice
or competition, scholarship, admission to an educational
HB0060

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0382
institution or any other benefit that accompanies
participating in the interscholastic athletic activity.

(e) A government entity, any licensing or any
athletic association shall not entertain or consider a
complaint, open an investigation, retaliate or take any
adverse action against:

(i) A school for maintaining separate athletic
teams or sports activities for students of the female sex;
or

(ii) A student if the student or the parent or
guardian of a student requests a contested case pursuant to
subsection (f) of this section or that reports a violation
of this section to an employee or representative of the
school or athletic association or to any state or federal
agency with oversight of the school.

(g) No school shall participate in any athletic
activity designated for students of the female sex with or
against a team that the school knows or, to a reasonable
HB0060

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0382
degree of certainty believes, has on the team a student of
the male sex.

Section 3. W.S. 16-4-405(a)(xiii), 21-25-101(a)(ii)
and 21-25-201 through 21-25-204 are repealed.

Section 4. Not later than July 1, 2025, the
University of Wyoming and each Wyoming community college
shall take all actions necessary to implement this act.

Section 5.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 4 and 5 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0060